Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Sale of Property by Administrator

393A.400.
Public sale of property.

Subject to KRS

393A.410

, the administrator may sell the property no earlier than three (3) years after receipt of property presumed abandoned.

Before selling property under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall give notice to the public of:

The date of the sale; and

A reasonable description of the property.

A sale under subsection (1) of this section shall be to the highest bidder:

At public sale at a location in this state which the administrator determines to be the most favorable market for the property;

On the Internet; or

On another forum the administrator determines is likely to yield the highest net proceeds of sale.

The administrator may decline the highest bid at a sale under this section and reoffer the property for sale if the administrator determines the highest bid is insufficient.

If a sale held under this section is to be conducted other than on the Internet, the administrator shall publish at least one (1) notice of the sale, at least three (3) weeks but not more than five (5) weeks before the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is sold.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 40, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.410.
Disposal of securities.

The administrator shall not sell or otherwise liquidate a security until three (3) years after the administrator receives the security and gives the apparent owner notice under KRS

393A.290

that the administrator holds the security.

The administrator shall not sell a security listed on an established stock exchange for less than the price prevailing on the exchange at the time of sale. The administrator may sell a security not listed on an established exchange by any commercially reasonable method.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 41, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.420.
Recovery of securities or value by owner.

If securities are sold by the administrator before the expiration of three (3) years after their delivery to the administrator, a person making a claim under this chapter before the end of the three (3) year period shall be entitled to the proceeds of the sale of the securities or the market value of the securities at the time the claim is made, plus dividends, interest, and other increments up to the time the claim is made, less any deduction for expenses of the sale.

A person making a claim under this chapter after the expiration of the three (3) year period shall be entitled to receive the securities delivered to the administrator by the holder, if the securities remain in the custody of the administrator, or the net proceeds received from the sale, and shall not be entitled to receive any appreciation in the value of the property occurring after the delivery to the administrator.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 42, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.430.
Purchaser owns property after sale.

A purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the administrator under this chapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner, a previous holder, or a person claiming through the owner or holder. The administrator shall execute documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership to the purchaser.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 43, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.440.
Military medal or decoration.

The administrator shall not sell a medal or decoration awarded for military service in the Armed Forces of the United States.

The administrator, with the consent of the respective organization under paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection, may deliver a medal or decoration described in subsection (1) of this section to be held in custody for the owner, to:

A military veterans organization qualified under 26

U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(19)

;

The agency that awarded the medal or decoration;

The Kentucky Historical Society, or any museum or historical society approved by the administrator; or

A governmental entity.

On delivery under subsection (2) of this section, the administrator shall not be responsible for safekeeping the medal or decoration.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 44, effective July 14, 2018.